Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General

§ 49-17-1.
Short title.

Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 may be cited as the “Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-135; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 49-17-3.
Statement of policy.

Whereas, the pollution of the air and waters of the state constitutes a menace to public health and welfare, creates a public nuisance, is harmful to wildlife, fish and aquatic life, and impairs domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational and other legitimate beneficial uses of air and water, and whereas, the problem of air and water pollution in this state is closely related to the problem of air and water pollution in adjoining states, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state to conserve the air and waters of the state and to protect, maintain and improve the quality thereof for public use, for the propagation of wildlife, fish and aquatic life, and for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational and other legitimate beneficial uses; to maintain such a reasonable degree of quality of the air resources of the state to protect the health, general welfare and physical property of the people, and to provide that no waste be discharged into any waters of the state without first receiving the necessary treatment or other corrective action to protect the legitimate beneficial uses of such waters; to provide for the prevention, abatement and control of new or existing air or water pollution; and to cooperate with other agencies of the state, agencies of other states, and the federal government in carrying out these objectives.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-111; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 49-17-5.
Definitions.

For the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

Water.

“Pollution” means such contamination, or other alteration of the physical, chemical or biological properties, of any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance or leak into any waters of the state unless in compliance with a valid permit issued therefor by the Permit Board.

“Wastes” means sewage, industrial wastes, oil field wastes, and all other liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substances which may pollute or tend to pollute any waters of the state.

“Sewerage system” means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and other structures, devices, appurtenances and facilities used for collecting or conducting wastes to an ultimate point for treatment or disposal.

“Treatment works” means any plant or other works, used for the purpose of treating, stabilizing or holding wastes.

“Disposal system” means a system for disposing of wastes, either by surface or underground methods, and includes sewerage systems, treatment works, disposal wells and other systems.

“Waters of the state” means all waters within the jurisdiction of this state, including all streams, lakes, ponds, impounding reservoirs, marshes, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation systems, drainage systems, and all other bodies or accumulations of water, surface and underground, natural or artificial, situated wholly or partly within or bordering upon the state, and such coastal waters as are within the jurisdiction of the state, except lakes, ponds or other surface waters which are wholly landlocked and privately owned, and which are not regulated under the Federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq).

“Underground water” means an underground source of drinking water as defined within the regulations of the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act.

Air.

“Air contaminant” means particulate matter, dust, fumes, gas, mist, smoke or vapor, or any combination thereof, produced by processes other than natural.

“Air pollution” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air contaminants in quantities, of characteristic, and of a duration which are materially injurious or can be reasonably expected to become materially injurious to human, plant or animal life or to property, or which unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life or use of property throughout the state or throughout such area of the state as shall be affected thereby.

“Air contamination” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air contaminants which contribute to a condition of air pollution.

“Air contamination source” means any source at, from, or by reason of which there is emitted into the atmosphere any air contaminant, regardless of who the person may be who owns or operates the building, premises or other property in, at, or on which such source is located, or the facility, equipment or other property by which the emission is caused or from which the emission comes.

“Air-cleaning device” means any method, process or equipment, the primary function of which is to remove, reduce or render less noxious air contaminants discharged into the atmosphere.

“Area of the state” means any city or county or portion thereof, or other substantial geographical area of the state as may be designated by the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Federal Clean Air Act” means the Federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., as amended.

General.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality acting through the Office of Pollution Control of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Person” means the state or other agency or institution thereof, any municipality, political subdivision, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, association or other entity, and includes any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or public or private corporation, or the United States or any officer or employee thereof.

“Pollution Emergency Fund” means the fund established under Section 49-17-68.

“General permit” means a permit for categories of sources that involve similar wastes and have similar monitoring requirements and restrictions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-112; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 54; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 12; Laws, 1987, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 561, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 49-17-7.
Transfer of duties and responsibilities of Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Commission.

The Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality shall be the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Commission, and shall exercise the duties and responsibilities of the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Commission through the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

The words “Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Commission” wherever they may appear in the laws of the State of Mississippi shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-113; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 3; Laws, 1972, ch. 369, § 14; ch. 505, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 53; Laws, 1999, ch. 573, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§§ 49-17-9 and 49-17-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1978, ch. 484, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§49-17-9. [Codes, 1942, § 7106-132; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 22]

§49-17-11. [Codes, 1942, § 7106-114; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 4; Am Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 3]

§ 49-17-13.
Commission designated as pollution control agency for state; assistance from other state agencies.

The commission is hereby designated as the pollution control agency for this state to administer federal pollution control legislation and programs and interstate or regional agreements pertaining to solid or hazardous waste management.

The commission shall have the right to call upon and receive the assistance of any officer, board, department, school, university or any other state agency, and officers and employees thereof, for any reasonable assistance necessary or beneficial in carrying out the provisions of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-115; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 5; Laws, 1971, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 4 1978, ch. 484, § 55; Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 235; Laws, 1989, ch. 552, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 573, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 49-17-14.
Title V air operating permit program; program fee trust fund; expenditures for authorized purposes.

“Title V program” means, as used in Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-45, the air operating permit program mandated in Title V of the 1990 amendments to the federal Clean Air Act, codified in 42 U.S.C.S. Section 7661, et seq.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the “Air Operating Permit Program Fee Trust Fund,” referred to hereinafter as the “fund.”

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal therein shall be credited by the Treasurer to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source including, but not limited to, collection of fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations and judicial actions.

To facilitate the proper administration of the fund, the commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the fund.

The commission shall expend or utilize monies in the fund by an annual appropriation approved by the Legislature to pay all reasonable direct and indirect costs associated with the development and administration of the Title V program including, but not limited to, the reasonable costs of the following activities as they relate to the Title V program:

Preparing generally applicable regulations or guidance regarding the permit program or its implementation or enforcement;

Reviewing and acting on any application for a permit, permit modification or permit renewal, including the development of an applicable requirement as part of the processing of a permit, or permit modification or renewal;

Administering the permit program, including the supporting and tracking of permit applications, compliance certification, and related data entry;

Implementing and enforcing the terms of any Title V permit (not including any court costs or other costs associated with an enforcement action), including adequate resources to determine which sources are subject to the program;

Emissions and ambient monitoring;

Modeling, analyses, or demonstrations;

Preparing inventories and tracking emissions;

Providing direct and indirect support to sources under the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program under Section 507 of the federal Clean Air Act in determining and meeting their obligations under this section; and

Providing funding to the Advisory Council created in Section 49-17-16 in an amount reasonably sufficient to meet the Advisory Council’s obligations under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-45.

Monies in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the fund for use in the next succeeding fiscal year. If the annual fees collected exceed the cost of administering the Title V program for that fiscal year, then the excess shall be applied to the cost of administering the program for the succeeding fiscal year. In the succeeding fiscal year, the total to be collected from fees shall be reduced by the excess retained in the fund and the assessment rates shall be adjusted proportionately.

No such fees shall be utilized by the Department of Environmental Quality or any other person for any purpose or purposes other than those purposes required by Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-45.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 611, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1993).

§ 49-17-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1978, ch. 484, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

[Am Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 17; Codes, 1942, § 7106-131; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 21]

§ 49-17-16.
Advisory Council.

An Advisory Council, hereinafter referred to as “Advisory Council,” is created to conduct an independent study of the costs for the development and administration of the Title V program within the Department of Environmental Quality and to conduct an annual review of the costs of administering such programs.

The costs to be included within the study for the Title V program shall be those costs set forth in Section 49-17-14. The Advisory Council shall include within the study the type and quantity of actual and allowable emissions within the state that are covered by the Title V program. After completing a study of the program needs and costs the Advisory Council shall recommend an equitable fee system for the Title V program that is based on the type and quantity of emissions. The annual review for the air operating permit program shall determine if the fee system is collecting sufficient funds to meet Title V program needs. Each annual review report shall be due January 1 of each succeeding year to the commission and the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

The Advisory Council shall submit recommendations to the Department of Environmental Quality concerning the costs of the development, implementation and administration of the State Air Operating Permit Implementation Plan in advance of the state’s submittal to the Environmental Protection Agency which is due by November 1993. The Department of Environmental Quality shall assist the Advisory Council by providing any information the Advisory Council may require to perform its duties under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-45.

The Advisory Council shall be composed of the following seven (7) persons appointed as follows: three (3) representatives of permitted industries that qualify for inclusion under the Title V program, that are required to pay the permit fee and that are also permittees under the National Pollution Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit program of the Clean Water Act, with one (1) such representative to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) by the Lieutenant Governor and one (1) by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; the Executive Director of the Department of Economic and Community Development; the President of the Mississippi Manufacturers Association; the President of the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation; and the Chairman of the Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel. Nonappointed members of the Advisory Council may designate an alternate member to act in their stead in performing any function of the Advisory Council.

The initial terms of appointment of the members of the Advisory Council shall be as follows: the representatives of the permitted industries appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve a term of one (1) year; the representative of the permitted industry appointed by the Governor and the Chairman of the Mississippi Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel shall serve a term of two (2) years; the Executive Director of the Department of Economic and Community Development and the President of the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation, or their designees, shall serve a term of three (3) years; and the President of the Mississippi Manufacturers Association, or his designee, shall serve a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, the length of the term for each member of the Advisory Council shall be four (4) years.

Original appointments to the Advisory Council shall be made no later than June 1, 1993. Vacancies on the Advisory Council shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original appointments. The Advisory Council shall convene within sixty (60) days following the date of the appointment of the members.

The Advisory Council shall select from their membership a chairperson to preside over meetings and a vice-chairperson to preside in the absence of the chairperson or when the chairperson shall be excused. The Advisory Council shall adopt procedures governing the manner of conducting its business. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum to do business.

Members of the Advisory Council shall serve without salary. The members of the Advisory Council shall be entitled to receive reimbursement of their actual travel and hotel expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, incurred while in the performance of their duties as members of the Advisory Council to be paid on an itemized statement approved by the State Fiscal Officer. Expenses shall be paid from fees collected in accordance with Section 49-17-30.

The Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide technical, clerical and other support services, including services by contract, as the Advisory Council determines that it requires in the performance of its functions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 611, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1993).

§ 49-17-17.
Powers and duties.

The commission shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

General supervision of the administration and enforcement of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated thereunder;

To develop comprehensive programs for the prevention, control and abatement of new or existing pollution of the air and waters of the state;

To advise, consult, cooperate, or enter into contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, other states and interstate agencies, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, and with affected groups, political subdivisions, and industries in furtherance of carrying out the provisions of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and shall have the authority to enter into compacts with any other state or states for the purpose of achieving the objectives of such sections with respect to air and waters, or to authorize the executive director with the approval of the commission to exercise any of the aforementioned powers;

To administer funds allocated to the state’s water and air pollution abatement grant program, to accept and administer loans and grants from the federal government and from other sources, public or private, for carrying out any of its functions, which loans and grants shall not be expended for other than the purposes for which provided;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, research and demonstrations relating to air and water quality and pollution and causes, prevention, control and abatement as it may deem advisable and necessary for the discharge of its duties under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43; to make funds available from the water pollution abatement grant fund by means of advances to political subdivisions in this state in an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of the estimated project cost as approved by and under such rules and regulations as adopted by the commission for the preparation of project planning reports and feasibility analyses; and to exercise such supervision as it may deem advisable and necessary for the discharge of its duties under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43;

To require the repayment of funds made available to a political subdivision under subsection (e) above to the water pollution abatement grant fund prior to the receipt of any other funds by any political subdivision providing services to the area and receiving funds provided under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43; any funds made available to any political subdivisions providing services to the area and receiving funds under the provisions of said sections shall be repaid in the same manner as are other funds made available to the political subdivisions under the provisions of said sections;

To collect and disseminate information relating to air and water quality and pollution and the prevention, control, supervision and abatement thereof;

To adopt, modify or repeal and promulgate ambient air and water quality standards and emissions standards for the state under such conditions as the commission may prescribe for the prevention, control and abatement of pollution;

To adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and, where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the commission under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, and as the commission may deem necessary to prevent, control and abate existing or potential pollution;

To issue, modify, or revoke orders (1) prohibiting, controlling or abating discharges of contaminants and wastes into the air and waters of the state; (2) requiring the construction of new disposal systems, or air-cleaning devices, or any parts thereof or the modification, extension or alteration of existing disposal systems, or air-cleaning devices, or any parts thereof, or the adoption of other remedial measures to prevent, control or abate air and water pollution; and (3) setting standards of air or water quality or evidencing any other determination by the commission under Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43;

To hold such hearings, to issue notices of hearing and subpoenas requiring the attendance of such witnesses and the production of such evidence, to administer oaths, and to take such testimony as the commission deems necessary;

To require the prior submission of plans, specifications and other data relative to, and to inspect the construction of, disposal systems, or air-cleaning devices, or any part thereof, in connection with the issuance of such permits or approval as are required by Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43;

To require proper maintenance and operation of disposal systems, or air-cleaning devices; and to require the installation and operation of monitoring devices or methods as may be deemed necessary and the maintenance and submission of monitoring and operating records as may be prescribed;

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47; and

To delegate in such manner as it sees fit the duties and powers relating to air and water quality and pollution control to the agency members presently engaged in the several fields of water or air control or pollution. In cases of difference of opinion between such agencies as to their respective field of operation, the commission shall delegate said responsibility to the proper agency, and the commission’s action therein shall be final.

Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to grant to the commission any jurisdiction or authority to make any rule or regulation, recommendation or determination or to enter any order with respect to air conditions existing solely within the property boundaries of commercial and industrial plants, works, or shops or to affect the relations between employers and employees with respect to or arising out of any air condition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-116; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 6; Laws, 1971, ch. 456, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 5; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 13; Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1982).

§ 49-17-19.
Standards of air and water quality.

In order to carry out the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, the commission may set ambient standards of air and water quality for the state or portions thereof. Such ambient standards of quality shall be such as to protect the public health and welfare and the present and prospective future use of such air and of such waters for public water supplies, propagation of fish and aquatic life and wildlife, recreational purposes, and agricultural, industrial and other legitimate uses. Such ambient standards may be amended from time to time as determined to be necessary by the commission. In order to carry out the purposes of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, the commission may also set emission standards for the purpose of controlling air contamination, air pollution and the sources thereof. In establishing ambient air quality standards for odor, the commission shall adopt recognized objective standards if they exist. In the absence of a recognized objective ambient air quality standard for odor, the commission may adopt such subjective standards as may be appropriate.

In establishing such standards relating to pesticides and commercial fertilizers for underground water, the commission shall adopt federal standards if they exist. If no federal standard exists, the commission shall petition the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency to establish a federal standard for the substance of interest. If the commission determines that a federal standard cannot be obtained within thirty (30) days, it shall consult with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s Office of Drinking Water and Office of Pesticide Programs regarding the agency’s conclusion relative to available toxicological information on the substance of interest and on the methodology used for establishing a federal standard. The commission shall utilize this information and methodology to establish a standard. The commission may also consult with and request similar information from other sources.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-119; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 9; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 7; Laws, 1982, ch. 411, § 9; Laws, 1987, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 333 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 49-17-21.
Inspections and investigations; access to and maintenance of records; testing and sampling; monitoring equipment.

The commission or its duly authorized representative shall have the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property, and the owner, managing agent or occupant of any such property shall permit such entry for the purpose of inspecting and investigating conditions relating to pollution or the possible pollution of any air or waters of the state and to have access to such records as the commission may require under subsection (b) of this section.

The commission may require the maintenance of records relating to the operation of air contamination sources or water disposal systems, and any authorized representative of the commission may examine and copy any such records or memoranda pertaining to the operation of such air contamination source or water disposal system. The records shall contain such information as the commission may require. Copies of such records shall be submitted to the commission upon request.

The commission may conduct, authorize or require tests and take samples of air contaminants or waste waters, fuel, process material or other material which affects or may affect (1) emission of air contaminants from any source, or (2) waste water disposal systems. Upon request of the commission, the person responsible for the source to be tested shall provide necessary sampling ports in stacks or ducts and such other safe and proper sampling and testing facilities as may be necessary for proper determination of the emission of air contaminants. If an authorized employee of the commission during the course of any inspection obtains a sample of air contaminant, fuel, process material or other material, he shall give the owner or operator of the equipment or fuel facility a receipt for the sample obtained.

The commission may require the installation, maintenance and use of such monitoring equipment and methods at such locations and intervals as the commission deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-122; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 12; Laws, 1968, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 10; Laws, 1973, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 4, 1977).

§ 49-17-22.
Enforcement powers of Commission on Marine Resources; cooperation with commission or environmental quality.

The Commission on Marine Resources is hereby authorized to cooperate with the Commission on Environmental Quality for the enforcement of the provisions of Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 in and on the salt waters of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-116 (last ¶); Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-17-23.
Record of minutes, rules, regulations and orders; annual publication, available to public; copies; index.

The commission shall keep the minutes of the commission, including all orders, rules and regulations promulgated, in a record book, or books, especially prepared for that purpose.

All minutes of commission meetings and hearings, and all rules, regulations, and orders made by the commission shall be in writing and shall be filed in full by the commission in a book for such purposes, to be kept by the commission which shall be a public record and open to inspection by the public at all times during all reasonable hours. The commission shall compile and publish annually the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission in current consolidated version. The commission shall provide the consolidated compilation of the rules and regulations to the public for a cost sufficient to cover printing and postage and administrative expenses, including the cost of any contractual services necessary to compile and publish such rules and regulations on an annual basis. A copy of any rule, minutes, regulation or order certified by the commission shall be received in evidence in all courts of this state with the same effect as the original. The commission shall compile and index on a current date basis all orders of the commission in a book for such purposes that shall be available for inspection and copying by the public. All responsibilities of the commission pursuant to this section may be delegated by the commission to the Executive Director.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7106-124, 7106-129; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, §§ 14, 19; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, §§ 12, 16; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 611, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1993).

§ 49-17-25.
Procedures for publication, adoption, amendment or repeal of rules and regulations necessary to implement laws administered by Department of Environmental Quality; notice.

Prior to the adoption, amendment or repeal of rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter, Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, Sections 37-138-1 through 37-138-31, and all other laws administered by the department, the commission shall conduct a public hearing or hearings thereon after public notice. Such notice shall be given by publication once a week for three (3) successive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation throughout the state. The notice shall contain a description of the proposed regulation and the time, date and place of the hearing.

Additionally, the adoption, amendment or repeal of any rule or regulation under this chapter, Sections 17-17-1 through 17-17-47, Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, Sections 37-138-1 through 37-138-31 and all other laws administered by the department shall be governed by the “Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law.” Any rule or regulation heretofore or hereafter adopted, amended or repealed in substantial compliance with the procedural requirements under Section 25-43-7 shall be valid. A proceeding to contest any rule or regulation on the ground of noncompliance with the procedural requirements of this section must be commenced within one (1) year from the effective date of the rule or regulation.

Notice of rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be published once in a newspaper having general circulation throughout the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-130; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 20; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 333 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 49-17-26.
Notification procedures as to chemicals in underground water exceeding state standards.

If the commission determines, after adequate scientific investigation and evaluation, that a chemical as defined in Sections 69-23-3 and 75-47-5(a) in the underground water exceeds or is likely to exceed duly adopted state standards and that the source of the chemical is not within the regulatory jurisdiction of the commission, the commission shall notify the Department of Agriculture and Commerce, which shall proceed in accordance with Section 69-23-7 and other existing laws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 523, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 49-17-27.
Emergency orders; public notice of emergency situations.

In the event an emergency is found to exist by the commission, it may issue an emergency order as circumstances may require. Said emergency order shall become operative at the time and date designated therein and shall remain in force until modified or cancelled by the commission or superseded by a regular order of the commission or for a period of forty-five (45) days from its effective date, whichever shall occur first, and may be enforced by an injunction if necessary.

The chancery court shall always be deemed open for hearing requests for injunctions to enforce such emergency orders and the same shall have precedence over other matters.

When, in the opinion of the commission or its executive director, an emergency situation exists which creates an imminent and substantial endangerment threatening the public health and safety or the lives and property of the people of this state, notice shall be given immediately to local governing authorities, both county and municipal, the state emergency management organization, and the governor for appropriate action in accordance with applicable laws for protections against disaster situations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-123; Laws, 1966, ch. 258, § 13; Laws, 1972, ch. 505, § 11; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 49-17-28.
Permit board; membership; compensation.

There is created a Permit Board for the purpose of issuing, reissuing, modifying, revoking or denying, under the conditions, limitations and exemptions prescribed in Section 49-17-29: (a) permits to control or prevent the discharge of contaminants and wastes into the air and waters of the state; (b) permits required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17); (c) permits required under Sections 51-3-1 through 51-3-55; (d) water quality certifications required by Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act; and (e) all other permits within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board. The membership of the Permit Board shall be composed of the Chief of the Bureau of Environmental Health of the State Board of Health, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, or his designee; the Head of the Office of Land and Water Resources of the Department of Environmental Quality, or his designee; the Supervisor of the State Oil and Gas Board, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources, or his designee; the Head of the Office of Geology and Energy Resources of the Department of Environmental Quality, or his designee; the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, or his designee; a retired professional engineer knowledgeable in the engineering of water wells and water supply systems, to be appointed by the Governor for a term concurrent with that of the Governor and until his successor is appointed and qualified; and a retired water well contractor, to be appointed by the Governor for a term concurrent with that of the Governor and until his successor is appointed and qualified. The retired professional engineer and the retired water well contractor shall only vote on matters pertaining to the Office of Land and Water Resources.

Members of the Permit Board who are officers and employees of the state shall receive no compensation for their services on the board, but other board members shall receive per diem compensation as provided in Section 25-3-69. All board members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses, including mileage, incurred in the performance of their official duties as provided in Section 25-3-41.

In implementing the authority granted under this section for the Permit Board to act on water quality certifications required by Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act, the Permit Board shall authorize the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality to make decisions on issuance, reissuance, denial, modification and revocation of water quality certifications on projects which the department has received no written adverse comments. The Permit Board may authorize the executive director to make decisions on water quality certifications for other projects. A decision of the executive director made under this authority shall be a decision of the Permit Board and shall be subject to a formal hearing and an appeal as provided in Section 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 327, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 56; Laws, 1981, ch. 528, § 14; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 30; Laws, 1988, ch. 312, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 60; Laws, 1996, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 573, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.